ARiashchikov/seminar_tasks/noun_plural_ex2.foma
def Lexicon [[[c a t]|[t o r c h]|[a l l y]|[f o r m u l a]][["[Sg]":0]|["[Pl]":["+"s]]]]|[["goose[Sg]":"goose"]|["goose[Pl]":"geese"]] ;
def EInsert %+ -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ s ;
def YReplace y -> i e || _ "+" s ;
def Cleanup %+ -> 0 ;
regex Lexicon .o. EInsert .o. YReplace .o. Cleanup ;
